Utah statutes.
76-8-808.   Detention and arrest without warrant of unauthorized persons on posted premises.

Any peace officer or any person employed as watchman, guard, or in a supervisory capacity on premises posted as provided in Section 76-8-807 may stop any person found on any premises to which entry without permission is forbidden by Section 76-8-807 and may detain him for the purpose of demanding, and may demand, of him, his name, address, and business in such place. If the peace officer or employee has reason to believe that the person has no right to be in the place, he shall release the person or he may arrest him without a warrant on the charge of violating the provisions of Section 76-8-807; and the employee shall release him or turn him over to the peace officer, or may arrest him without a warrant on the charge of violating the provisions of Section 76-8-807.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

